src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/uk.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-                                                                 
WORDCHARS -'`
BREAK 1
BREAK -
#IGNORE  
REP 5
REP     
REP           
REP           
REP          
REP         
SFX V Y 83
SFX V        [^ ]   
SFX V        [^ ]   
SFX V          
SFX V          
SFX V      [^ ]   
SFX V       [^ ]   
SFX V          
SFX V      [^ ]   
SFX V       [^ ]   
SFX V         
SFX V         
SFX V          
SFX V           
SFX V         [^ ]    
SFX V         [^ ]    
SFX V      [^ ]    
SFX V        [^ ]    
SFX V      [^ ]    
SFX V        [^ ]    
SFX V             
SFX V             
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V          
SFX V         
SFX V           
SFX V         
SFX V           
SFX V         
SFX V   0 [  ]  
SFX V     [  ]  
SFX V      [  ]  
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V          
SFX V         
SFX V           
SFX V         
SFX V           
SFX V         
SFX V 0     [  ]  
SFX V 0     [  ]  
SFX V 0    [  ]  
SFX V 0    [  ]  
SFX V 0   [  ]  
SFX V 0    [  ]  
SFX V 0    [  ]  
SFX V 0   [  ]  
SFX V 0    [  ]  
SFX V 0   [  ]  
SFX V 0   [  ]  
SFX V 0    [  ]  
SFX V 0     [  ]  
SFX V             
SFX V             
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V             
SFX V             
SFX V             
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V           
SFX V           
SFX V            
SFX V             
SFX U Y 13
SFX U             
SFX U             
SFX U            
SFX U            
SFX U           
SFX U            
SFX U            
SFX U           
SFX U            
SFX U           
SFX U           
SFX U            
SFX U             
SFX W Y 3
SFX W      [^    ]   
SFX W          
SFX W          
SFX a Y 235
SFX a     [^    ]  
SFX a     [^    ]  
SFX a       
SFX a      [^    ]  
SFX a      [    ]  
SFX a          
SFX a          
SFX a       [^ ]   
SFX a             
SFX a          
SFX a     [^      ' ]  
SFX a       
SFX a      [^      ' ]  
SFX a     ['       ]  
SFX a      ['       ]  
SFX a        [^ ]   
SFX a          [^ ]   
SFX a         [^ ]   
SFX a        [^ ]   
SFX a             
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a             
SFX a           
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a        [^ ]   
SFX a          [^ ]   
SFX a         [^ ]   
SFX a        [^ ]   
SFX a         [^  ]    
SFX a           [^  ]    
SFX a          [^  ]    
SFX a         [^  ]    
SFX a        [  ]    
SFX a          [  ]    
SFX a         [  ]    
SFX a        [  ]    
SFX a           
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a              
SFX a                
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a              
SFX a                
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a           
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a              
SFX a                
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a                
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a        [   ]   
SFX a          [   ]   
SFX a         [   ]   
SFX a        [   ]   
SFX a        [^ ]   
SFX a          [^ ]   
SFX a         [^ ]   
SFX a        [^ ]   
SFX a         [^ ]    
SFX a           [^ ]    
SFX a          [^ ]    
SFX a         [^ ]    
SFX a        [ ]    
SFX a          [ ]    
SFX a         [ ]    
SFX a        [ ]    
SFX a           
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a        [^   ]   
SFX a          [^   ]   
SFX a         [^   ]   
SFX a        [^   ]   
SFX a         [  ]   
SFX a           [  ]   
SFX a          [  ]   
SFX a         [  ]   
SFX a        [^ ][   ]   
SFX a          [^ ][   ]   
SFX a         [^ ][   ]   
SFX a        [^ ][   ]   
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a         [ ]    
SFX a           [ ]    
SFX a          [ ]    
SFX a         [ ]    
SFX a         [^   ]    
SFX a           [^   ]    
SFX a          [^   ]    
SFX a         [^   ]    
SFX a         [^ ][  ]    
SFX a           [^ ][  ]    
SFX a          [^ ][  ]    
SFX a         [^ ][  ]    
SFX a            
SFX a              
SFX a            
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a              
SFX a            
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a              
SFX a            
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a            
SFX a             
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a             
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a             
SFX a             
SFX a               
SFX a              
SFX a             
SFX a                
SFX a                  
SFX a                 
SFX a                
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
SFX a            
SFX a            
SFX a             
SFX a            
SFX a              
SFX a         [^ ]    
SFX a           [^ ]    
SFX a         [^ ]    
SFX a          [^ ]    
SFX a                
SFX a                  
SFX a                
SFX a                 
SFX a        [^    ]    
SFX a          [^    ]    
SFX a         [^    ]    
SFX a        [^    ]    
SFX a                
SFX a                  
SFX a                 
SFX a                
SFX a        [          ]     
SFX a          [          ]     
SFX a         [          ]     
SFX a           [^          ]     
SFX a             [^          ]     
SFX a           [^          ]     
SFX a            [^          ]     
SFX a        [           ][  ]    
SFX a          [           ][  ]    
SFX a         [           ][  ]    
SFX a        [           ][  ]    
SFX a           [^           ]     
SFX a             [^           ]     
SFX a            [^           ]     
SFX a           [^           ]     
SFX a           [^          ]     
SFX a             [^          ]     
SFX a            [^          ]     
SFX a           [^          ]     
SFX a         
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a           
SFX a 0       
SFX a 0         
SFX a 0         
SFX a 0         
SFX a         
SFX a          
SFX a           
SFX a          
